Utah statutes.
16-10a-825.   Committees.
(1)  Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a board
of directors may create one or more committees and appoint members of the
board of directors to serve on them.  Each committee shall have two or more
members, who serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.
(2)  The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be
approved by the greater of:
(a)  a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or
(b)  the number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or
bylaws to take action under Section 16-10a-824.
(3)  Sections 16-10a-820 through 16-10a-824, which govern meetings, action
without meeting, notice, waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements
of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.
(4)  To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of
incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the
board of directors under Section 16-10a-801.
(5)  The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee
does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of
conduct described in Section 16-10a-840.
